Alabama, session 2026rs, HB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
17 Section 1. Sections 41-23-130, 41-23-131, 41-23-132,
18 41-23-133, and 41-23-134, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to
19 read as follows:
20 "§41-23-130
21 When used in this article, the following words and
22 phrases have the following meanings unless the context clearly
23 indicates otherwise:
24 (1) DEPARTMENT or ADECA. The Alabama Department of
25 Economic and Community Affairs.
26 (2) FUND. The Alabama Port Infrastructure Fund created
27 by Section 41-23-132.
28 (1)(3) INLAND PORTSPORT. InlandAny portsport, including
Page 1

(1)(3) INLAND PORTSPORT. InlandAny portsport, including
U9UVZDX-1 02/04/2026 JRF (H) HSE 2025-3116
House Ways and Means General Fund Reported
Substitute for HB135
29 portsa port owned or operated by the Alabama State Port
30 Authority, arethat is physical sitesphysically located away
31 from traditional land, air, and coastal borders with the
32 vision to facilitate and process international and domestic
33 trade through strategic investment in multi-modalmultimodal
34 transportation assets and by promoting value-added services as
35 goods move through the supply chain. The term specifically
36 excludes the Port of Mobile.
37 (2)(4) INTERMODAL FACILITY. A transportation element
38 that accommodates and interconnects different modes of
39 transportation and serves intrastate, interstate, and
40 international movement of people and goods and facilitates the
41 movement of goods on two or more modes involving either direct
42 transfer or intermediate storage.
43 (5) PORT. Any inland port as defined in subsection (3),
44 public port located in coastal areas, or the Port of Mobile.
45 (3)(6) PORT FACILITY. Any authority, municipality,
46 county, or publicly owned inland port through which cargo is
47 transported by way of waterborne ship, barge, or railroad, to
48 or from destinations inside or outside this state and which
49 handles cargo owned by third parties.
50 (7) PROGRAM. The Alabama Port Infrastructure Grant
51 Program created by Section 41-23-131."
52 "§41-23-131
53 (a) The Alabama Port Infrastructure Grant ProgramInland
54 Ports and Intermodal Development Fund is created within the
55 Alabama Department of Economic and Community Affairs to
56 receive appropriations from the State General Fund for the
Page 2

receive appropriations from the State General Fund for the
U9UVZDX-1 02/04/2026 JRF (H) HSE 2025-3116
House Ways and Means General Fund Reported
Substitute for HB135
57 purpose of financing improvements to existing publicly owned
58 inland ports and intermodal facility infrastructure. The
59 program shall award grants to fund the improvement,
60 maintenance, and construction of ports and intermodal
61 facilities within the state. Funding for the grant
62 programGrants shall be awarded on a competitive bid basis for
63 inland port and intermodal facilityport and intermodal
64 facility projects that will have a significant local or
65 regional impact. Priority of funding shall be given to inland
66 ports and intermodal facilities that have proven performance
67 in reducing congestion on public highways and increasing
68 tonnage at port facilities and that will enhance regional
69 competitiveness for port operators and users.
70 (b) Any project funded from this program shall meet the
71 following requirements:
72 (1) The minimum amount of participation for local
73 matching funds is 20 percent of the project amount.
74 (2) The amount awarded from the program may not exceed
75 50 percent of the total budgeted project costs.
76 (3) The award amount of an individual grant may not
77 exceed 20 percent of the total grant funds awarded in a single
78 fiscal year.
79 (4) The indirect costs and administrative costs of the
80 project may not exceed 10 percent of the amount awarded.
81 (c) The department shall develop application procedures
82 and eligibility criteria for the program and shall award
83 grants to facilitate the program. Grants shall be awarded
84 based on a competitive scoring system developed by the
Page 3

based on a competitive scoring system developed by the
U9UVZDX-1 02/04/2026 JRF (H) HSE 2025-3116
House Ways and Means General Fund Reported
Substitute for HB135
85 department. The department may fund partial awards if funding
86 requested from the program exceeds the amount of available
87 funding.
88 (b)(d) To receive funds under this article, an inland a
89 port or intermodal facility shall file an application with the
90 department describing how the funds will be used and any other
91 information the department may require. No application shall
92 be approved or funds distributed unless the expenditure of
93 funds are:
94 (1) Directly related to capital improvements, dredging
95 for project development in the immediate vicinity of an
96 existing inland port, economic development of an inlanda port
97 facility, or the rebuilding or rehabilitation of basic
98 waterway and port infrastructure;
99 (2) For a project or use directly related to intermodal
100 infrastructure development;
101 (3) For a purpose outside the normal operating budget
102 of an inland a port, or intermodal infrastructure facility, or
103 a river-related community; or
104 (4) For purposes of making improvements to ports or
105 intermodal infrastructure facilities;
106 (4)(5) For purpose of assessment or planning or for
107 efforts to grow and expand ports or intermodal infrastructure
108 facilities; or
109 (6) For purposes of establishing or constructing new
110 ports, or to acquire land for new ports, if a feasibility
111 study and competitive analysis have been conducted and
112 submitted for review to the department.
Page 4

submitted for review to the department.
U9UVZDX-1 02/04/2026 JRF (H) HSE 2025-3116
House Ways and Means General Fund Reported
Substitute for HB135
113 (c)(e) Funding shall not be approvedused for routine
114 maintenance, administrative, and operational expenses, or for
115 the dredging of waterways within the state that are not in the
116 immediate vicinity of an inlanda port facility. Additionally,
117 the use of funding to establish or construct new inland ports,
118 or to acquire land for new inland ports, shall not be eligible
119 for funding unless a feasibility study and competitive
120 analysis have been conducted and submitted for review to the
121 department."
122 "§41-23-132
123 (a) The Alabama Port Infrastructure Fund is created in
124 the State Treasury to be administered by the department to
125 fund the program. The fund is subject to appropriations by the
126 Legislature. Monies in the fund shall only be expended for
127 purposes listed in this article. The fund shall be budgeted
128 and allotted in accordance with Article 4 of Chapter 4 of
129 Title 41 and Chapter 19 of Title 41.
130 (a)(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
131 the contrary, the Legislature shall annually appropriate
132 twofive million dollars ($2,000,000)($5,000,000) from the
133 State General Fund to the Alabama Department of Economic and
134 Community Affairs to establish a grant program to facilitate
135 and coordinate inland port and transfer facility development,
136 improvement, maintenance, onsite storage, moorings, and
137 constructionfund the program. The appropriation shall be
138 effective beginning fiscal year 2026 and continue through the
139 2028 fiscal year, unless continued by an act of the
140 Legislature.
Page 5

Legislature.
U9UVZDX-1 02/04/2026 JRF (H) HSE 2025-3116
House Ways and Means General Fund Reported
Substitute for HB135
141 (b)(c) Upon appropriations, the monies shall be kept in
142 the Inland Ports and Intermodal Development Fund fund created
143 in this sectionSection 41-23-131 and shall be subject to audit
144 by the Department of Examiners of Public Accounts in the same
145 manner as all other department funds. Any unexpended monies
146 remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall
147 remain in the fund and shall not revert. to the State General
148 Fund. The amount of the appropriation for the upcoming fiscal
149 year appropriation shall be reduced by the amount carried
150 forward such that the department will have no more than five
151 million dollars ($5,000,000) in any single fiscal year to
152 administer the grant program. Any monies that remain
153 unexpended at the end of the third fiscal year shall revert to
154 the State General Fund. Any unencumbered funds remaining
155 pursuant to this article after three years shall revert to the
156 State General Fund
157 (d) No more than ten percent of the total amount
158 appropriated for the program in any fiscal year may be
159 expended for administration of the program.
160 (e) For any fiscal year in which grants are awarded
161 under the program, by the first day of the next regular
162 session of the Legislature, the department shall publish an
163 annual report regarding the grants awarded under the program
164 during the prior fiscal year. The report shall include the
165 improvements made to ports and intermodal facilities supported
166 by grant funds."
167 "§41-23-133
168 (a) This article shall not apply nor have any effect on
Page 6

(a) This article shall not apply nor have any effect on
U9UVZDX-1 02/04/2026 JRF (H) HSE 2025-3116
House Ways and Means General Fund Reported
Substitute for HB135
169 any state agency currently havingwith control over local port
170 or infrastructure commissions or authorities.
171 (b) This article shall not changeaffect any existing
172 other laws that apply to any existing port or infrastructure
173 commission or authority, or to powers presently provided for
174 conducting and developing the water transportation industry,
175 and all such existing laws are expressly preserved and shall
176 not be preempted by this article.
177 (c) No provision of this article shall be construed to
178 authorize any diversion from local port or infrastructure
179 commissions or authorities of fees, funds, donations, grants,
180 or monies to which the commission or authorities are otherwise
181 entitled.
182 (d) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit
183 any port's ability to receive funding from other sources as
184 provided for by state or federal law."
185 "§41-23-134
186 The Alabama Department of Economic and Community
187 Affairsdepartment shall adopt rules, restrictions, and
188 eligibility requirements as are necessary to implement and
189 administer this article."
190 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
191 1, 2026.
Page 7